Hawaii statutes.
[§431:8-323] Exemption from examination.
(a) Subject to section 431:8-322, an individual who applies for a nonresident
surplus lines broker license in this State who was previously licensed
to sell surplus lines insurance in another state shall not be required
to complete any prelicensing education or examination. This exemption is only
available if the person is currently licensed in that state or if the
application is received within ninety days of the cancellation of the
applicant's previous license and if the prior state issues a certification
that, at the time of cancellation, the applicant was licensed in good standing
in that state, or the state's producer database records, maintained by the
National Association of Insurance Commissioners, its affiliates, or its
subsidiaries, indicate that the surplus lines broker's license is or was in
good standing.

(b) A person licensed as a surplus lines
broker in another state who moves to this State and makes application
within ninety days of establishing legal residence to become a resident
licensee pursuant to section 431:8-310, shall not be required to satisfy the
prelicensing educational components and examination otherwise required to
obtain any line of authority previously held in the prior state, provided that
the commissioner may impose these or other requirements by rule. [L 2012, c 66,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next